Wyoming, session 2026, HB0178.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 27-7-116 is created to read:
27-7-116. Public employee labor organizations;
limitations on support.
(a) No public employer, nor its agents or
representatives or any persons acting on behalf of the
public employer, shall use or authorize the use of public
funds or facilities to support or fundraise by:
(i) Deducting dues, fees, assessments, fines or
contributions from the pay of any public employee on behalf
of a:
(A) Labor organization or its affiliate;
(B) Political action committee governed
under title 22, chapter 25 of the Wyoming statutes;
(C) Political organization as defined by 26
U.S.C. § 527(e)(1);
(D) Political committee as defined by 52
U.S.C. § 30101(4);
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0178
ENROLLED ACT NO. 35, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(E) Any candidate for federal, state or
local office.
(b) Any person who violates this section shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(i) Authorize a governmental entity that does
not independently possess the authority to engage in
collective bargaining with a labor organization;
(ii) Permit any conduct prohibited by W.S.
9-13-105;
(iii) Permit a public employee to be required to
have a connection with a labor organization as a condition
of employment, in violation of W.S. 27-7-112;
(iv) Impair the right of fire fighters to
collectively bargain as provided by W.S. 27-10-101 through
27-10-109, including the ability to collectively bargain
for deductions from wages;
(v) Require a governmental entity to take
actions that would violate 49 U.S.C. § 5333(b) or
jeopardize its continued eligibility to receive federal
transit administration funding;
(vi) Prohibit a public employee from paying
dues, fees, contributions or other charges directly to a
labor organization or a political fund organized by or
associated with the labor organization;
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0178
ENROLLED ACT NO. 35, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(vii) Require any labor organization to disclose
the names or identifying information of its members.
Section 2. W.S. 27-7-108 by creating new subsections
(c) and (d) and 27-7-115 are amended to read:
27-7-108. Right to work; definitions.
(c) "Public employee" means an employee of a public
employer.
(d) "Public employer" means the state of Wyoming, any
city, town, county or political subdivision in Wyoming and
any agency or instrumentality thereof. "Public employer"
shall not include a public safety agency as defined by W.S.
9-2-1101(b)(i) or a corporate authority as defined by W.S.
27-10-101(a)(ii).
27-7-115. Right to work; penalties.
Any person convicted of a misdemeanor, as defined in this
act or as specified in W.S. 27-7-116, shall be punished by
a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or
imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed
six (6) months, or both.
Section 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
alter, amend or impair any contract or other agreement
entered into before the effective date of this act.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0178
ENROLLED ACT NO. 35, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 4. This act is effective January 1, 2027.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4